Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.407

Alternative public works contracting procedures—Termination.

The alternative public works contracting procedures under chapter 39.10 RCW shall be terminated June 30, 2031, as provided in RCW 43.131.408.

[ 2021 c 230 s 21; 2013 c 222 s 21; 2007 c 494 s 506.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Part headings and captions not law—Effective dates—Severability—2007 c 494: See RCW 39.10.903 through 39.10.905.